foma/verb/ThamizhiVerbs-C11.lexc
LEXICON C11Vinf

%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^த்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^த்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^த்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^த்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^த்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^த்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^த்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^த்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^த்தார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^த்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^த்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^த்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^க்கிறார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^க்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^க்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^க்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^க்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^க்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^க்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^க்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^க்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^க்கின்றார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^க்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^க்கின்றது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3pln%=அன:^க்கின்றன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்போம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^ப்பார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=ப்ப்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3sgn%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+fut%=உம்%|+3pln%=∅:^ும் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^த்தனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+past%=(த்)த்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^த்தனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கிறனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கிறனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+1sg%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgm%=அன்:^க்கின்றனன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+strong%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+euph%=அன்%|+3sgf%=அள்:^க்கின்றனள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2sg%=∅:^ #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+2pl%=உங்கள்:^ுங்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+euph%=ஏ:^ாதே #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+imp%=∅%|+neg%=ஆத்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ாதீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பித்தேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பித்தோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பித்தன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பித்தாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பித்தீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பித்தீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பித்தான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பித்தாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பித்தர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பித்தார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^ப்பித்தார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பித்தது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+past%=%(த்%)த்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பித்தன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கிறேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கிறோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கிறன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கிறாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கிறான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கிறாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கிறர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கிறார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்:^ப்பிக்கிறார் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3sgn%=அது:^ப்பிக்கிறது #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கிற்%|+3pln%=அன:^ப்பிக்கிறன #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=ஏன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றேன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1pl%=ஓம்:^ப்பிக்கின்றோம் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+1sg%=அன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றன் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sg%=ஆய்:^ப்பிக்கின்றாய் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2sgh%=ஈர்:^ப்பிக்கின்றீர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+2pl%=ஈர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கின்றீர்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgm%=ஆன்:^ப்பிக்கின்றான் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sgf%=ஆள்:^ப்பிக்கின்றாள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sge%=அர்:^ப்பிக்கின்றர் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3ple%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கின்றார்கள் #;
%|+verb%|+fin%|+sim%|+caus%=ப்பி%|+pres%=க்கின்ற்%|+3sghe%=ஆர்கள்:^ப்பிக்கின்றார்கள் #;

LEXICON ClassEleven
அதிகரி  C11Vinf;
கடகட  C11Vinf;
வெலவெல  C11Vinf;
சதசத  C11Vinf;
கா  C11Vinf;
அந்தி  C11Vinf;
தளதள  C11Vinf;
யா  C11Vinf;
நய  C11Vinf;
அகலி  C11Vinf;
அர்ப்பி  C11Vinf;
படபட  C11Vinf;
அஞ்சலி  C11Vinf;
அரி  C11Vinf;
மர  C11Vinf;
அத்தமி  C11Vinf;
இரி  C11Vinf;
அலக்கழி  C11Vinf;
ஆதரி  C11Vinf;
இலச்சி  C11Vinf;
அவ்வி  C11Vinf;
ஆராதி  C11Vinf;
இவரி  C11Vinf;
அன்னுவயி  C11Vinf;
ஆலோசி  C11Vinf;
ஈரி  C11Vinf;
அனுசரி  C11Vinf;
ஆவாகி  C11Vinf;
உசிப்பி  C11Vinf;
அனுமானி  C11Vinf;
இச்சி  C11Vinf;
உடற்கரி  C11Vinf;
ஆக்கிராணி  C11Vinf;
இமிசி  C11Vinf;
உத்தேசி  C11Vinf;
ஆசமி  C11Vinf;
இரட்டி  C11Vinf;
உபக்கிரமி  C11Vinf;
உபசரி  C11Vinf;
எண்பி  C11Vinf;
ஓமி  C11Vinf;
உபாசி  C11Vinf;
எளி  C11Vinf;
கடி  C11Vinf;
உரி  C11Vinf;
ஏம்பலி  C11Vinf;
கணிசி  C11Vinf;
உரூபி  C11Vinf;
ஓசி  C11Vinf;
கப்பி  C11Vinf;
கரி  C11Vinf;
உவட்டி  C11Vinf;
ஒப்பி  C11Vinf;
கர்ச்சி  C11Vinf;
ஊட்டி  C11Vinf;
ஒருக்களி  C11Vinf;
கருடி  C11Vinf;
உபநியசி  C11Vinf;
ஒளி  C11Vinf;
கலாபி  C11Vinf;
எச்சரி  C11Vinf;
குளி  C11Vinf;
சக்களி  C11Vinf;
கற்பி  C11Vinf;
கெக்கரி  C11Vinf;
சங்கரி  C11Vinf;
காமி  C11Vinf;
கெடி  C11Vinf;
சங்கிரமி  C11Vinf;
கிலேசி  C11Vinf;
கெம்பீரி  C11Vinf;
சத்தி  C11Vinf;
குச்சரி  C11Vinf;
கெலி  C11Vinf;
சந்தேகி  C11Vinf;
குதி  C11Vinf;
கொந்தளி  C11Vinf;
சபி  C11Vinf;
குமி  C11Vinf;
கொறி  C11Vinf;
சம்பவி  C11Vinf;
குருமி  C11Vinf;
கோடீகரி  C11Vinf;
சம்மதி  C11Vinf;
சமகரி  C11Vinf;
சிட்சி  C11Vinf;
சுதந்தரி  C11Vinf;
சமனி  C11Vinf;
சிந்தி  C11Vinf;
சுரி  C11Vinf;
சமீபி  C11Vinf;
சிமிளி  C11Vinf;
சுவாலி  C11Vinf;
சரி  C11Vinf;
சிலமி  C11Vinf;
சூக்குமி  C11Vinf;
சவக்களி  C11Vinf;
சிறங்கணி  C11Vinf;
சூரணி  C11Vinf;
சவுக்களி  C11Vinf;
சிறாம்பி  C11Vinf;
செந்தளி  C11Vinf;
சன்னி  C11Vinf;
சீரணி  C11Vinf;
செமி  C11Vinf;
சாதி  C11Vinf;
தடாரி  C11Vinf;
தாமசி  C11Vinf;
செறி  C11Vinf;
தத்தளி  C11Vinf;
தாரணி  C11Vinf;
சேகரி  C11Vinf;
தமரி  C11Vinf;
தாளி  C11Vinf;
சேமி  C11Vinf;
தரிசி  C11Vinf;
தித்தி  C11Vinf;
சொரூபிகரி  C11Vinf;
தவதாயி  C11Vinf;
திரி  C11Vinf;
சோடி  C11Vinf;
தற்காலி  C11Vinf;
திட்சி  C11Vinf;
சந்தோஷி  C11Vinf;
தனி  C11Vinf;
துஞ்சரி  C11Vinf;
தகி  C11Vinf;
தாணி  C11Vinf;
துணிகரி  C11Vinf;
துமி  C11Vinf;
நயப்பி  C11Vinf;
நீட்டி  C11Vinf;
துவாளி  C11Vinf;
நலி  C11Vinf;
நுதி  C11Vinf;
துனி  C11Vinf;
நாணி  C11Vinf;
நெறி  C11Vinf;
தெண்டி  C11Vinf;
நிண்ணயி  C11Vinf;
நொசி  C11Vinf;
தெழி  C11Vinf;
நிந்தி  C11Vinf;
நிரந்தரி  C11Vinf;
தொந்தி  C11Vinf;
நியோகி  C11Vinf;
பகிஷ்கமி  C11Vinf;
தோத்திரி  C11Vinf;
நிராகரி  C11Vinf;
பசு  C11Vinf;
பஞ்சலி  C11Vinf;
பவி  C11Vinf;
பிரயோகி  C11Vinf;
பணி  C11Vinf;
பாகி  C11Vinf;
பிரவாகி  C11Vinf;
பந்தி  C11Vinf;
பாரி  C11Vinf;
பிரார்த்தி  C11Vinf;
பராபரி  C11Vinf;
பிங்களி  C11Vinf;
பிறக்கணி  C11Vinf;
பரிக்கிரகி  C11Vinf;
பிணி  C11Vinf;
புசி  C11Vinf;
பரிட்சி  C11Vinf;
பிரசங்கி  C11Vinf;
புரி  C11Vinf;
பரிபாலி  C11Vinf;
பிரதிகூலி  C11Vinf;
பருப்பி  C11Vinf;
முளி  C11Vinf;
மந்தி  C11Vinf;
பேகணி  C11Vinf;
மொக்குளி  C11Vinf;
மறுக்களி  C11Vinf;
பொடி  C11Vinf;
யோகி  C11Vinf;
மின்னலி  C11Vinf;
போஷி  C11Vinf;
லிபி  C11Vinf;
மும்முரி  C11Vinf;
வக்கிணி  C11Vinf;
விழி  C11Vinf;
விகரி  C11Vinf;
வட்டி  C11Vinf;
வெகுமதி  C11Vinf;
விசுவசி  C11Vinf;
வரத்தி  C11Vinf;
வேதி  C11Vinf;
சீ  C11Vinf;
வியாபரி  C11Vinf;
விரோதி  C11Vinf;
இழு  C11Vinf;
நருநரு  C11Vinf;
சிலுசிலு  C11Vinf;
உடு  C11Vinf;
நளுநொளு  C11Vinf;
சுறுசுறு  C11Vinf;
கடுகடு  C11Vinf;
நொது  C11Vinf;
தழு  C11Vinf;
குமுகுமு  C11Vinf;
பிசுபிசு  C11Vinf;
தொகு  C11Vinf;
கொளுகாெளு  C11Vinf;
பொருபொரு  C11Vinf;
வேங்கு  C11Vinf;
மூ  C11Vinf;
அசை  C11Vinf;
மெதுமெது  C11Vinf;
குதை  C11Vinf;
அழை  C11Vinf;
வலு  C11Vinf;
சமை  C11Vinf;
இறை  C11Vinf;
விறுவிறு  C11Vinf;
சுணை  C11Vinf;
தளை  C11Vinf;
துணை  C11Vinf;
நகை  C11Vinf;
நிறை  C11Vinf;
பசை  C11Vinf;
புடை  C11Vinf;
மறை  C11Vinf;
முனை  C11Vinf;
விண்விணை  C11Vinf;
இறாய்  C11Vinf;
கிராய்  C11Vinf;
சாய்  C11Vinf;
துய்  C11Vinf;
பொய்  C11Vinf;
ஜமாய்  C11Vinf;
இலிர்  C11Vinf;
ஏர்  C11Vinf;
சதிர்  C11Vinf;
சேர்  C11Vinf;
திமிர்  C11Vinf;
தோர்  C11Vinf;
பிதிர்  C11Vinf;
போர்  C11Vinf;
விம்முயிர்  C11Vinf;
இமிழ்  C11Vinf;
தாழ்  C11Vinf;
